Nebraska, session 109, LB725.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB725 LB725
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 81-2102, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2102 For purposes of the State Electrical Act, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) Apprentice electrician means any person, other than a licensee,
who, as such person's principal occupation, is engaged in learning and
assisting in the installation, alteration, and repair of electrical
equipment as an employee of a licensee and who is registered with the
board. For purposes of this subdivision, persons who are not engaged in
the installation, alteration, or repair of electrical wiring and
apparatus, either inside or outside buildings, shall not be considered
apprentice electricians;
(2) Board means the State Electrical Board;
(3) Class A master electrician means a person having the necessary
qualifications, training, experience, and technical knowledge to properly
plan, lay out, and supervise the installation of wiring, apparatus, and
equipment for electric light, heat, power, power limited systems, and
other purposes and who is licensed by the board;
(4) Class B electrical contractor means a person having the
necessary qualifications, training, experience, and technical knowledge
to properly plan, lay out, install, and supervise the installation of
wiring, apparatus, and equipment for power limited systems not to exceed
one hundred volts and one thousand volt-amps in commercial installations,
industrial installations, systems of not over four hundred ampere
capacity for light, heat, power, and other purposes in any structure used
and maintained as a residential dwelling but not larger than a four-
family dwelling located in any municipality which has a population of
less than one hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most
recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified
count by the United States Bureau of the Census and who is licensed by
the board;
-2-

LB725 LB725
2026 2026
(5) Class B journeyman electrician means a person having the
necessary qualifications, training, experience, and technical knowledge
to wire for or install electrical wiring, apparatus, and equipment for
power limited systems not to exceed one hundred volts and one thousand
volt-amps in commercial installations, industrial installations, systems
of not over four hundred ampere capacity for light, heat, power, and
other purposes in any structure used and maintained as a residential
dwelling but not larger than a four-family dwelling located in any
municipality which has a population of less than one hundred thousand
inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or
the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of
the Census and who is licensed by the board;
(6) Commercial installation means an installation intended for
commerce, but does not include a residential installation;
(7) Electrical contractor means a person having the necessary
qualifications, training, experience, and technical knowledge to properly
plan, lay out, install, and supervise the installation of wiring,
apparatus, and equipment for electric light, heat, power, power limited
systems, and other purposes and who is licensed by the board;
(8) Fire alarm installer means any person having the necessary
qualifications, training, and experience to plan, lay out, and install
electrical wiring, apparatus, and equipment for only those components of
fire alarm systems from the first point of overcurrent that operate at
fifty volts or less and who is licensed by the board;
(9) Industrial installation means an installation intended for use
in the manufacture or processing of products involving systematic labor
or habitual employment and includes installations in which agricultural
or other products are habitually or customarily processed or stored for
others, either by buying or reselling on a fee basis;
(10) Inspector means a person certified as an electrical inspector
upon such reasonable conditions as may be adopted by the board. The board
-3-

LB725 LB725
2026 2026
may permit more than one class of electrical inspector;
(11) Journeyman electrician means a person having the necessary
qualifications, training, experience, and technical knowledge to wire for
or install electrical wiring, apparatus, and equipment, and power limited
systems, and to supervise apprentice electricians, and who is licensed by
the board;
(12) New electrical installation means the installation of wiring,
apparatus, and equipment for electric light, heat, power, and other
purposes;
(13) Public-use building or facility means any building or facility
designated for public use;
(14) Residential installation means an installation intended for a
single-family or two-family residential dwelling or a multi-family
residential dwelling not larger than three stories in height;
(15) Residential journeyman electrician means a person having the
necessary qualifications, training, experience, and technical knowledge
to wire for or install electrical wiring, apparatus, and equipment in any
structure used and maintained as a residential dwelling but not larger
than a four-family dwelling for residential installations and to
supervise apprentice electricians and who is licensed by the board;
(16) Routine maintenance means the repair or replacement of existing
electrical apparatus and equipment of the same size and type for which no
changes in wiring are made; and
(17) Special electrician means a person having the necessary
qualifications, training, and experience in wiring or installing special
classes of electrical wiring, apparatus, equipment, or installations
which shall include irrigation system wiring, well pump wiring, air
conditioning and refrigeration installation, and sign installation and
who is licensed by the board.
Sec. 2. Section 81-2107, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-4-

LB725 LB725
2026 2026
81-2107 (1) An applicant for an electrical contractor license shall
(a) be a graduate of a four-year electrical course in an accredited
college or university or (b) have at least one year's experience,
acceptable to the board, as a journeyman electrician.
(2) A Class B electrical contractor license shall be valid only for
power limited systems not to exceed one hundred volts and one thousand
volt-amps in commercial and industrial installations. in regard to
systems of not over four hundred amperes in capacity in structures used
and maintained as residential dwellings but not larger than four-family
dwellings located in any municipality which has a population of less than
one hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal
decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United
States Bureau of the Census.
Sec. 3. Section 81-2108, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2108 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section or
in section 81-2112 or 81-2144, no person shall, for another, wire for or
install electrical wiring, apparatus, or equipment unless he or she is
licensed by the board as a Class B electrical contractor, an electrical
contractor, a Class A master electrician, or a fire alarm installer.
(2) Except as provided in section 81-2106, 81-2112, or 81-2144, no
person shall wire for or install electrical wiring, apparatus, or
equipment or supervise an apprentice electrician unless such person is
licensed as a Class B journeyman electrician, a journeyman electrician, a
residential journeyman electrician, or a fire alarm installer and is
employed by a Class B electrical contractor, an electrical contractor, a
Class A master electrician, or a fire alarm installer.
(3) For purposes of this section, the holder of a fire alarm
installer license shall only supervise those apprentices engaged in the
installation of fire alarm equipment and apparatus operating at fifty
volts or less.
-5-

LB725 LB725
2026 2026
(4) (3) No person licensed under the State Electrical Act may lend
his or her license to any person or knowingly permit the use of such
license by another.
Sec. 4. Section 81-2109, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2109 (1) An applicant for a journeyman electrician license shall
have at least four years' experience, acceptable to the board, in the
electrical trade. Registration as an apprentice electrician for those
years shall, on the approval of the board, constitute evidence of such
experience. The board may by rule or regulation provide for the allowance
of one year of experience credit for successful completion of a two-year
post-high school electrical course approved by the board.
(2) An On and after July 16, 2004, an applicant for a Class B
residential journeyman electrician license shall have at least three
years' experience, acceptable to the board, in the electrical trade.
Registration as an apprentice electrician for those years shall, on the
approval of the board, constitute evidence of such experience. The board
may by rule or regulation provide for the allowance of one year of
experience credit for successful completion of a two-year post-high
school electrical course approved by the board. A residential journeyman
electrician license shall be valid only for residential installations.
(3) A Class B journeyman electrician license shall be valid only for
power limited systems not to exceed one hundred volts and one thousand
volt-amps in commercial and industrial installations. electrical systems
of not over four hundred amperes in capacity in structures used and
maintained as residential dwellings but not larger than four-family
dwellings located in any municipality which has a population of less than
one hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal
decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United
States Bureau of the Census.
Sec. 5. Section 81-2112.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-6-

LB725 LB725
2026 2026
amended to read:
81-2112.02 On and after September 9, 1993, any person licensed as a
fire alarm installer may plan, lay out, and install electrical wiring,
apparatus, and equipment for only those components of fire alarm systems
that operate at fifty volts or less. An applicant for a fire alarm
installer license shall have at least two years experience, acceptable to
the board, in planning, laying out, and installing fire alarm systems.
Sec. 6. Section 81-2113, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2113 (1) A person may register with the board and pay a fee as
provided in section 81-2118 to work as an apprentice electrician. Such
registration shall entitle the registrant to act as an apprentice
electrician to a Class B electrical contractor, an electrical contractor,
a Class B journeyman electrician, a journeyman electrician, a residential
journeyman electrician, or a Class A master electrician as provided in
subsection (2) of this section. At the time of registration renewal, an
apprentice shall pay the fee for renewal provided by section 81-2118 and
present documentary evidence of any continuing education courses under
section 81-2117.01 completed by the applicant. The board shall assess up
to a six-month increase of required experience necessary for the
applicant to qualify for the examination under section 81-2115 unless the
applicant presents documentary evidence of the requisite hours of
continuing education courses under section 81-2117.01.
(2) An apprentice electrician shall do no electrical wiring except
under the direct personal on-the-job supervision and control and in the
immediate presence of a licensee under the State Electrical Act. Such
supervision shall include both on-the-job training and related classroom
training as approved by the board. The licensee may employ or supervise
apprentice electricians at a ratio not to exceed three apprentice
electricians to one licensee, except that such ratio and the other
requirements of this section shall not be applicable to a teacher-student
-7-

LB725 LB725
2026 2026
relationship within a classroom of a community college.
(3) For purposes of this section, the direct personal on-the-job
supervision and control and in the immediate presence of a licensee shall
mean the licensee and the apprentice electrician shall be working at the
same project location but shall not require that the licensee and
apprentice electrician must be within sight of one another at all times.
(4) (3) An apprentice electrician shall not install, alter, or
repair electrical equipment except as provided in this section, and the
licensee employing or supervising an apprentice electrician shall not
authorize or permit such actions by the apprentice electrician.
Sec. 7. Section 81-2117.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2117.02 (1) No license as a Class A master electrician , Class B
electrical contractor, or Class B journeyman electrician shall be issued
on or after September 9, 1993, but such license licenses may be renewed
as provided in this section.
(2) A person licensed as a Class A master electrician , a Class B
electrical contractor, a Class B journeyman electrician, or a special
electrician on September 9, 1993, may renew such license on or after such
date upon presentation of documentary evidence of successful completion
of the requisite hours of continuing education courses under section
81-2117.01 and payment of the fee for renewal provided by section
81-2118.
Sec. 8. Section 81-2118, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2118 All licenses or registrations issued under the State
Electrical Act shall expire on December 31 of each even-numbered year.
All license or registration applications shall include the applicant's
social security number.
The board shall, by a unanimous vote of the board, set reasonable
fees for examination, issuance, and renewal of licenses and registrations
-8-

LB725 LB725
2026 2026
issued under the State Electrical Act in amounts necessary to cover the
costs incurred by the State Electrical Division and the board in
administering and carrying out the purposes of the State Electrical Act
and in a manner that unnecessary surpluses are avoided. The board shall
annually file a report with the Attorney General and the Legislative
Fiscal Analyst stating the amount of the fees set by the board. Such
reports shall be submitted on or before July 1 of each year. The report
submitted to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall be submitted
electronically. The board shall establish the following fees:
(1) For examination for the following licenses:
(a) Electrical contractor;
(b) Class B electrical contractor;
(c) (b) Journeyman electrician;
(d) Class B (c) Residential journeyman electrician;
(e) Resident journeyman electrician;
(f) (d) Fire alarm installer; and
(g) (e) Special electrician license , sixty dollars;
(2) For each year of the two-year license period for issuance and
renewal of the following licenses:
(a) Electrical contractor; and
(b) Class B electrical contractor;
(c) (b) Journeyman electrician;
(d) Class B , residential journeyman electrician;
(e) Residential journeyman electrician;
(f) Fire , fire alarm installer; and
(g) Special , or special electrician;
(3) For each year of the two-year registration period for issuance
and renewal as an apprentice electrician; and
(4) For renewal on or after September 9, 1993, of the Class A master
electrician license following licenses issued prior to such date for each
year of the two-year license period. :
-9-

LB725 LB725
2026 2026
(a) Class B electrical contractor;
(b) Class A master electrician; and
(c) Class B journeyman electrician.
The holder of a an expired license or registration may renew the
license or registration beginning October 1 through November 31 of even
numbered years upon payment of the license or registration fee. The
holder of a license or registration may renew the license or registration
from December 1 through December 31 of even numbered years for a period
of three months from the date of expiration upon payment of the license
or registration fee plus ten percent of the renewal fee for each month or
portion thereof past the expiration date. All holders of expired licenses
or registrations expired for more than three months shall apply for a new
license or registration.
Sec. 9. Section 81-2121, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2121 Nothing in the State Electrical Act shall be construed to:
(1) Require employees of municipal corporations, public power
districts, public power and irrigation districts, electric membership or
cooperative associations, public utility corporations, railroads,
telephone or telegraph companies, or commercial or industrial companies
performing manufacturing, installation, and repair work for such employer
to hold licenses while acting within the scope of their employment;
(2) Require any person doing work for which a license would
otherwise be required under the act to hold a license issued under the
act if he or she is the holder of a valid license issued by any city or
other political subdivision, so long as he or she makes electrical
installations only in the jurisdictional limits of such city or political
subdivision and such license issued by the city or political subdivision
meets the requirements of the act;
(3) Cover the installation, maintenance, repair, or alteration of
vertical transportation or passenger conveyors, elevators, moving walks,
-10-

LB725 LB725
2026 2026
dumbwaiters, stagelifts, manlifts, or appurtenances thereto beyond the
terminals of the controllers. The licensing of elevator contractors or
constructors shall not be considered a part of the licensing requirements
of the act;
(4) Require a license of any person who engages any electrical
appliance where approved electrical outlets are already installed;
(5) Prohibit an owner of property from performing work on his or her
principal residence, if such residence is not larger than a single-family
dwelling, or farmstead farm property, excluding commercial or industrial
installations or installations in public-use buildings or facilities, or
require such owner to be licensed under the act;
(6) Require that any person be a member of a labor union in order to
be licensed; or
(7) Prohibit a pump installation contractor or pump installation
supervisor licensed under the Water Well Standards and Contractors'
Practice Act from wiring pumps and pumping equipment at a water well
location to the first control.
Sec. 10. Section 81-2134, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2134 (1) As to state inspections: (a) At or before commencement
of any electrical installation which is required by law to be inspected,
the person responsible for the installation shall forward a request for
inspection to the board completed in the manner prescribed by the
board. ; and
(b) On installations requiring more than six months in the process
of construction and in excess of three hundred dollars total inspection
fees, the persons responsible for the installation may, after a minimum
filing fee of one hundred dollars, pay a prorated fee for each month and
submit it with an order for payment initiated by the electrical
inspector.
(2) Where wiring is to be concealed, the inspector must be notified
-11-

LB725 LB725
2026 2026
within reasonable time to complete a rough-in inspection prior to
concealment, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. If wiring is
concealed before rough-in inspection without adequate notice having been
given to the inspector, the person responsible for having enclosed the
wiring shall be responsible for all costs resulting from uncovering and
replacing the cover material.
(3) Inspections shall be made within one week of the appropriate
request. When necessary, circuits may be energized by the authorized
installer prior to inspection but the installation shall remain subject
to condemnation and disconnection.
Sec. 11. Section 81-2135, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2135 (1) The board shall, by a unanimous vote of the board, set
reasonable fees for state electrical inspections under the State
Electrical Act in amounts necessary to cover the costs incurred by the
State Electrical Division and the board in administering and carrying out
the purposes of the State Electrical Act and in a manner that unnecessary
surpluses are avoided. The board shall annually file a report with the
Attorney General and the Legislative Fiscal Analyst stating the amount of
the fees set by the board. Such reports shall be submitted on or before
July 1 of each year. The report submitted to the Legislative Fiscal
Analyst shall be submitted electronically.
(2) All state electrical inspection fees shall be due and payable to
the board at or before commencement of the installation and shall be
forwarded with the request for inspection. Inspection fees set by the
board in accordance with this section shall not apply within the
jurisdiction of any county, city, or village if the county, city, or
village has adopted an ordinance or resolution as set forth in the State
Electrical Act.
(3) The board shall establish the following fees:
(a) Minimum fee for each separate inspection of an installation,
-12-

LB725 LB725
2026 2026
replacement, alteration, or repair;
(b) Services, change of services, temporary services, additions,
alterations, or repairs on either primary or secondary services;
(c) Field irrigation system inspections;
(d) The first reinspection required as a result of a correction
order; a second reinspection required as a result of noncompliance with
the same correction order; and subsequent reinspections associated with
the same correction order; and
(e) An inspection is requested by an owner.
(4) The fee for fire and accident inspections shall be computed at
the rate set by the board per hour, and mileage and other expenses shall
be reimbursed as provided in section 81-1176.
(5) After an inspection the board may charge an additional fee if
the cost incurred during the inspection is greater than what was covered
by the original inspection fee.
Sec. 12. Section 81-2144, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2144 (1) A person who is a directional boring or knifing
contractor may install underground conduit or conductors on the load side
of the meter under the direct supervision of a Class A master
electrician, or journeyman electrician , or Class B journeyman
electrician who is employed by an electrical contractor.
(2) Electrical contractors who own and provide directional boring or
knifing services shall only allow employees that have an apprentice
registration or a journeyman electrician, a Class A master electrician,
or an electrical contractor license perform directional boring
activities.
Sec. 13. Original sections 81-2102, 81-2107, 81-2108, 81-2109,
81-2112.02, 81-2113, 81-2117.02, 81-2118, 81-2121, 81-2134, 81-2135, and
81-2144, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-13-